California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) One representative from an environmental protection organization.

(4) One representative from an ocean advocacy organization.

(5) One representative from an environmental justice organization.

(6) One representative from a disadvantaged or low-income community or rural area.

(7) One representative of a materials recovery facility located within the State of California.

(8) One representative of a recycling service provider, or a representative of an association of recycling service providers.

(9) One representative from the composting industry operating in the State of California.

(10) A representative of each of four manufacturers of covered materials of different material types utilizing postconsumer recycled content, one of which produces third-party certified compostable covered material. These board members shall not be a board member of a PRO.

(11) One representative nominated by a statewide association representing the retail sector. This board member shall be a nonvoting member.

(12) One representative nominated by a statewide association representing the grocery sector. This board member shall be a nonvoting member.

(13) One representative of a producer responsibility organization. This board member shall be a nonvoting member.

(b) The director shall appoint
 all members to the advisory board on or before July 1, 2023. The director shall appoint the members for staggered three-year terms, and may reappoint a member for additional terms. At its first meeting, the advisory board shall elect a chair who will serve as chair for the calendar year, and who may be reelected as chair.

(c) The advisory board shall meet at least once per year by the call of the chair or by request of a majority of the voting members. The department shall provide administrative support to the advisory board.

(d) The advisory board meetings shall be open to the public and are subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(e) (1) The advisory board shall provide the
 PRO and the department, and a third party conducting or updating a needs assessment if applicable, with initial recommendations regarding all of the following:

(A) Key barriers and possible solutions to advance the objectives of increasing recovery of covered materials and decreasing the leakage of plastic into the environment no later than one year after the advisory board’s initial meeting. This shall include key barriers and possible solutions related to available and viable responsible end markets and market development for covered materials.

(B) Key barriers and possible solutions to advance the objectives of reducing the production of virgin material for covered material and reducing the landfilling of covered material.

(C) Key barriers and possible pathways toward reusable packaging and products and refillable
 systems.

(D) Key barriers and other considerations needed for covered material to meet the requirements of this chapter.

(E) How a PRO will cover the costs incurred by local jurisdictions and local jurisdictions’ recycling service providers associated with implementing this chapter and managing the material covered in a plan.

(2) The department shall consider the recommendations provided under paragraph (1) as it evaluates which specific actions may be appropriate to advance the objectives of this chapter.

(f) The advisory board may take any of the following actions through written recommendations as the advisory board deems appropriate:

(1) Advise the department, producers, or PROs on
 technical matters in support of the goals of this chapter to create a circular economy and reduce covered material pollution.

(2) Advise the department in the adoption of the regulations required by this chapter.

(3) Advise the department, producers, or PROs on any other pertinent matters in implementing this chapter, as determined by the advisory board or department.

(g) Pursuant to Section 42067, the advisory board shall review any needs assessment or revised needs assessment submitted to it within 90 calendar days of receipt of the assessment.

(h) Within 60 calendar days of receiving a plan submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42051.2, the advisory board shall review the plan and offer written comments, which may include suggested modifications to the plan.

(i) The advisory board shall submit written recommendations to the department only if a majority of the advisory board’s voting members endorse the recommendation. One or more advisory board members who do not endorse the recommendation may submit a separate written recommendation to the department reflecting the minority opinion or opinions.

(j) If an affected entity asserts that specific actions taken to meet the requirements of this chapter are disrupting or otherwise adversely affecting the sustained operation or commercial viability of solid waste collection programs,
 solid waste recycling facilities, or composting facilities providing services in accordance with local solid waste handling requirements, the affected entity may bring the concern and evidence supporting this assertion to the advisory board for discussion and ask the advisory board to conduct a preliminary evaluation of the information. If the evaluation demonstrates that specific actions are disrupting or otherwise adversely affecting existing operations, the advisory board shall submit this concern to the department for further analysis. The department shall analyze the information provided by the advisory board and may offer a recommendation for resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement [42080. - 42084.]

42080.

(a) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, including, but not limited to, failure by a PRO to implement and satisfy the requirements of its plan, shall subject a PRO, producer, wholesaler, or retailer to penalties for violations as set forth in this article or revocation of an approved plan. The department may conduct investigations, including by inspecting operations, facilities, and records of producers and PROs and by performing audits of producers and PROs, to determine whether entities are complying with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) The department may deem the information contained in an audit provided by a PRO pursuant to Section 42054 or the records maintained by the PRO pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section
 42052 to be sufficient to establish violations of the requirements of this chapter.

(c) The department shall notify a PRO, producer, retailer, or wholesaler of any conduct or practice that does not comply with this chapter and of any inconsistencies identified in the department’s audit.

(d) Within 15 calendar days of the director approving a completed audit of a PRO, producer, retailer, or wholesaler, the department shall notify the audited entity that the audit will be posted on the department’s internet website. The department shall post the completed audit on the department’s internet website no later than 45 calendar days after it provides that notice.

(e) The department shall hold its audit confidentially only to the extent it contains information that is specifically identified as and constitutes a trade secret
 pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code or is otherwise exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). Within 15 calendar days of receiving a completed audit and notice from the department that the audit will be posted on the department’s internet website, the PRO, producer, retailer, or wholesaler audited by the department shall specifically identify each portion of the audit that it claims constitutes or contains a trade secret. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in regulations promulgated pursuant to Section 40062, information not identified as a trade secret and information improperly identified as a trade secret shall be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) unless exempted from disclosure by another provision of
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42081.

(a) (1) The department may issue a notice of violation to, and impose an administrative civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day per violation on, any entity not in compliance with this chapter or any of the regulations the department adopts to implement this chapter, unless the entity meets the criteria of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 42060, in which case the civil penalty shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day per violation.

(2) A violation of Section 42050 by a producer or the PRO shall be determined based on the brand name, package or product line, package or product form, covered material category, and package or product size that the department deems is not in
 compliance.

(3) Penalties against a PRO or producer shall not begin accruing with respect to a violation until 30 calendar days following the notification of the violation.

(4) The department shall deposit all penalties collected pursuant to this section into the Circular Economy Penalty Account, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the Circular Economy Penalty Account shall be available upon appropriation by the Legislature for purposes that further this chapter.

(b) (1) Before determining whether to assess a penalty, the department may allow a producer or a PRO to develop and submit a corrective action plan to the department detailing how and when the producer or a PRO will come into compliance with this chapter. Corrective action plans may include, but are not limited to,
 actions such as shifting production to covered material categories that meet the recycling rates required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42050, no longer offering the covered material for sale, reaching a minimum recycled content standard set by the department, or establishing a take-back system or deposit system for the covered material that would increase the recycling rate of the material. The department shall not assess a penalty and the producer shall not be listed as noncompliant pursuant to Section 42082 for material covered in a corrective action plan if the producer complies with the corrective action plan. A producer or PRO may request approval from the department to comply with a corrective action plan or elements of a corrective action plan in cooperation with other producers or PROs.

(2) (A) The duration of a corrective action plan shall not exceed 24 months. The department may extend a corrective
 action plan up to an additional 12 months if the department sets forth steps and a timeline for the producer or PRO to comply with the corrective action plan and if the producer or PRO made a substantial effort to comply but was reasonably prevented from doing so due to extenuating circumstances.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, making a “substantial effort” means taking all practicable actions to comply with a corrective action plan. Substantial effort is not made in circumstances in which a producer or PRO has not taken reasonable steps to comply with a corrective action plan, including, but not limited to, providing staff resources and funding necessary for compliance.

(3) The department’s authority under this article to impose penalties and to consider a corrective action plan do not affect the department’s authority to withdraw its approval of a PRO plan pursuant to
 Section 42051.2 and the department may impose penalties and consider corrective action plans against the PRO or producers without revoking an approved plan.

(c) The department, in determining the penalty amount and whether to assess a penalty under this section, shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation or a condition giving rise to the violation and the various remedies and penalties that are appropriate in the given circumstances, with primary emphasis on protecting the public health and safety and the environment.

(2) Whether the violation or conditions giving rise to the violation have been corrected in a timely fashion or whether reasonable progress is being made to correct the violation or conditions giving rise to the violation.

(3) Whether the violation or conditions giving rise to the violation demonstrate a pattern of noncompliance with this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. If the violation is a first offense, and the nature and gravity of the violation is not considered egregious, the department shall consider assessing a penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day.

(4) Whether the violation or conditions giving rise to the violation were intentional.

(5) Whether the violation or conditions giving rise to the violation were voluntarily and promptly reported to the department before the commencement of an investigation or audit by the department.

(6) Whether the violation or conditions giving rise to the violation were due to
 circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the producer or PRO or were otherwise unavoidable under the circumstances, including, but not limited to, unforeseen changes in market conditions. This does not include circumstances in which curbside collection either was not available or not suitable for the collection and processing of the covered material and the PRO or producer failed to adequately invest in or develop other means to collect or process the covered material.

(7) The size and economic condition of the producer or PRO.

(8) The magnitude of the impact on the environment, human health, and disadvantaged or low-income communities or rural areas reasonably anticipated from the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 848, Sec. 12.   (AB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42082.

(a) The department shall post on its internet website a list of covered material categories, including by material form if applicable, by producer, that are not in compliance with this chapter. The department shall update the list at least once every six months.

(b) The department may provide, upon request, a list of covered material categories, by producer if applicable, that are in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42083.

A producer may offer for sale, sell, distribute, or import covered material in a covered material category that does not meet the recycling rates established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42050 if the producer demonstrates to the department that the producer has achieved the applicable rate for an amount equal to the producer’s market share of that covered material category in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42084.

(a) If the department determines that a producer responsibility organization or producer has not achieved the targets established pursuant to Section 42050 or 42057, the department shall, through a public process, adopt regulations that do both of the following:

(1) Place requirements on the PRO or producers to achieve the recycling rates established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42050 or subdivision (i) of Section 42057.

(2) Place requirements on producers to source reduce, by both weight and number of items, to meet the requirements of Section 42057.

(b) The regulations shall apply to the PRO or producer
 after the date of the target or upon the end of any approved corrective action plan, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Metallic Discards [42160. - 42185.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [42160. - 42168.]

42160.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42161.

“Metallic discard” means any large metal article or product, or any part thereof, including, but not limited to, metal furniture, machinery, major appliances, electronic products, and wood-burning stoves.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42162.

“Salvage” means the controlled removal of metallic discards from the solid waste stream at a permitted solid waste facility for the express purpose of recycling or reuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42163.

“Recycling residue” means nonhazardous residue or residue treated to be nonhazardous that is a direct result of metals recovery operations for the express purposes of recycling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42164.

“Solid waste landfill” means a solid waste landfill, as defined in Section 40195.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1041, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42165.

“Vehicle” means any device used for transportation. “Vehicle” includes bicycles, airplanes, and other transportation devices not used on highways, and automobiles and other vehicles, as defined in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42166.

“Major appliance” means any domestic or commercial device, including, but not limited to, a washing machine, clothes dryer, hot water heater, dehumidifier, conventional oven, microwave oven, stove, refrigerator, freezer, air-conditioner, trash compactor, and residential furnace.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42167.

“Materials that require special handling” means all of the following:

(a) Sodium azide canisters in unspent airbags that are determined to be hazardous by federal and state law or regulation.

(b) Encapsulated polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs), Di(2-Ethylhexylphthalate) (DEHP), and metal encased capacitors, in major appliances.

(c) Chlorofluorocarbons (CFCs), hydrochlorofluorocarbons (HCFCs), and other non-CFC replacement refrigerants, injected in air-conditioning/refrigeration units.

(d) Used oil, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code, in major appliances. Materials described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code are not excluded from the definition of used oil for the purposes of this section.

(e) Mercury found in switches and temperature control devices in major appliances.

(f) Any other material that, when removed from a major appliance, is a hazardous waste regulated pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 880, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42168.

“Solid waste facility” means a solid waste facility as defined in Section 40194.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Disposal of Metallic Discard [42170. - 42172.]

42170.

(a) After January 1, 1994, no solid waste facility shall accept for disposal any major appliance, vehicle, or other metallic discard which contains enough metal to be economically feasible to salvage as determined by the solid waste facility operator. 

(b) After January 1, 1994, no person shall place a major appliance or other metallic discard in mixed municipal solid waste or dispose of a major appliance or other metallic discard in or on land, except for a solid waste landfill operator who complies with subdivision (a). This material shall be delivered to a facility to process for reuse or recycling, placed in a solid waste facility for salvage, or disposed of at a solid waste landfill if economically infeasible to salvage. 

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any solid waste facility operator who salvages major appliances, vehicles, other metallic discards or other recyclables shall not be required to revise the solid waste facilities permit to implement these activities. 

(d) This section shall be subject to enforcement pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 45000) of Part 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42171.

The board shall evaluate the use of recycling residue for use as solid waste landfill cover materials or for use as extenders for currently used cover material. If used as daily cover or as extenders to daily cover, recycling residues shall have all of the physical characteristics required by regulations for cover materials adopted pursuant to Section 43020. The results of this evaluation shall be reported in the report required pursuant to Section 40507.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42172.

The board shall conduct its evaluation of recycling residue in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the State Air Resources Board, the state water board, and any other agency having pertinent jurisdiction. Recycling residue used as daily cover or as extenders in daily cover shall meet performance standards and requirements for cover material as specified in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 43020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Processing Metallic Discards [42175. - 42175.1.]

42175.

Materials that require special handling shall be removed from major appliances and vehicles in which they are contained prior to crushing for transport or transferring to a baler or shredder for recycling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 884, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42175.1.

(a) Any hazardous material that becomes a hazardous waste when released or removed from any major appliance shall be managed pursuant to Article 10.1 (commencing with Section 25211) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Any mercury-containing motor vehicle light switch that becomes a hazardous waste when removed from any vehicle shall be managed pursuant to Article 10.2 (commencing with Section 25214.5) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Failure to comply with the requirements of Section 42175 is a violation of Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 626, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Fees and Surcharges for Recycling Residue [42185. - 42185.]

42185.

No city or county shall impose any fees, except facility operating fees, state-mandated fees, or fees pursuant to Sections 41901, 41902, 41903, and 43213, or surcharges on the disposal of recycling residue generated from the metals recovery and reuse of major appliances, vehicles, and other metallic discards, provided the residue is not delivered to the solid waste facility mixed with other solid waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Compost Market Program [42230. - 42246.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [42230. - 42231.]

42230.

The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42231.

“Compost” means the product resulting from the controlled biological decomposition of organic wastes that are sources separated from the municipal solid waste stream.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Compost Market Program [42240. - 42246.]

42240.

The Department of General Services and the department, in consultation with other affected state agencies, shall maintain specifications for the purchase of compost by the State of California. The specifications shall designate the state minimum operating standards and product quality standards. The specifications shall be designed to maximize the use of compost without jeopardizing the safety and health of the citizens of the state or the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 2411)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42241.

The Department of Transportation shall use compost in place of, or to supplement, petroleum-based commercial fertilizers in the state’s highway landscape maintenance program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 238, Sec. 2.   (AB 2411)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42241.3.

(a) On or before December 31, 2019, the department, in coordination with the Department of Transportation, shall do both of the following:

(1) Identify best practices for each of the Department of Transportation’s 12 districts regarding the cost-effective use of compost along roadways. The best practices shall reflect the highest and best use of compost, taking into consideration the circumstances particular to each jurisdiction.

(2) Develop a plan to implement the best practices identified pursuant to paragraph (1) in each of the Department of Transportation’s 12 districts.

(b) The department shall review the best practices identified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) at least once every five years, and update the best practices as necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 238, Sec. 3.   (AB 2411)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42241.5.

The department may develop a program to increase the use of compost products in agricultural applications. The program may include, but shall not be limited to, either or both of the following:

(a) Identification of federal, state, and local financial assistance.

(b) Cooperative efforts with appropriate federal and state agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 238, Sec. 4.   (AB 2411)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42243.

The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and the Department of General Services shall initiate programs to restore public lands that use compost, co-compost, rice straw, and chemically fixed sewage sludge and shall use those products or materials wherever possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 238, Sec. 5.   (AB 2411)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42243.5.

On or before December 31, 2019, the department shall develop and implement a plan to maximize the use of compost for slope stabilization and for establishing vegetation in the course of providing debris removal services following a wildfire.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 238, Sec. 6.   (AB 2411)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42244.

The department shall evaluate compost, co-compost, and chemically fixed sewage sludge for use as solid waste landfill cover materials or for use as extenders for currently used cover material. Compost, co-compost, and chemically fixed sewage sludge products, when used as a substitute for or mixed with currently approved cover material, shall possess all the physical characteristics required in the definition of a cover material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 238, Sec. 7.   (AB 2411)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42244.5.

On or before January 1, 1994, the board shall evaluate rice straw for use as a solid waste landfill cover material or for use as an extender for currently used cover material. Rice straw or rice straw materials, when used as a substitute for or mixed with currently approved cover material, shall possess all the physical characteristics required in the definition of a cover material. The results of the evaluation shall be included in the report required pursuant to Section 40507.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1207, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42245.

Based on the results of the evaluation conducted in accordance with Section 42244, the department may, on a case-by-case basis, approve the use of compost, co-compost, and chemically fixed sewage sludge, that meet the performance standards for cover material, for up to 25 percent of landfill cover materials or landfill cover extenders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 238, Sec. 8.   (AB 2411)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42246.

Any procuring agency that prepares a request for bid for commercial fertilizers or soil amendment products shall document its determination that the use of a compost, co-compost, or chemically fixed sewage sludge would jeopardize public health or safety or would jeopardize the intended result of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.2. Single-Use Foodware Accessories and Condiments [42270. - 42273.]

42270.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Consumer” has the same meaning as in Section 113757 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Food facility” has the same meaning as in Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Ready-to-eat food” has the same meaning as in Section 113881 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Single-use” means designed to be used once and then discarded, and not designed for repeated use and sanitizing.

(e) “Single-use foodware accessory” means all of the following single-use items provided alongside ready-to-eat food:

(1) Utensils, which is defined as forks, knives, spoons, and sporks.

(2) Chopsticks.

(3) Condiment cups and packets.

(4) Straws.

(5) Stirrers.

(6) Splash sticks.

(7) Cocktail sticks.

(f) “Standard condiment” means relishes, spices, sauces, confections, or seasonings that require no
 additional preparation and that are usually used on a food item after preparation, including ketchup, mustard, mayonnaise, soy sauce, hot sauce, salsa, salt, pepper, sugar, and sugar substitutes.

(g) “Third-party food delivery platform” has the same meaning as in Section 113930.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (AB 1276)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42271.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), a food facility, for on-premises dining or when using a third-party food delivery platform, shall not provide any single-use foodware accessory or standard condiment packaged for single use to a consumer unless the single-use foodware accessory or standard condiment is requested by the consumer.

(b) Single-use foodware accessories and standard condiments packaged for single use provided by food facilities for use by consumers shall not be bundled or packaged in a manner that prohibits a consumer from taking only the type of single-use foodware accessory or standard condiment desired without also having to take a different type of
 single-use foodware accessory or standard condiment.

(c) A food facility may ask a drive-through consumer if the consumer wants a single-use foodware accessory if the single-use foodware accessory is necessary for the consumer to consume ready-to-eat food, or to prevent spills of or safely transport ready-to-eat food. 

(d) A food facility that is located entirely within a public use airport, as defined in Section 77.3 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, may ask a walk-through consumer if the consumer wants a single-use foodware accessory if the single-use foodware accessory is necessary for the consumer to consume ready-to-eat food, or to prevent spills of or safely transport ready-to-eat food. 

(e) (1) A third-party food delivery platform shall provide consumers with the option to request single-use foodware accessories or standard condiments from a food facility serving ready-to-eat food.

(2) If a food facility uses any third-party delivery platform for ready-to-eat food, the food facility shall customize its menu with a list of available single-use foodware accessories and standard condiments, and only those single-use foodware accessories or standard condiments selected by the consumer shall be provided by the food facility. If a consumer does not select any single-use foodware accessories or standard condiments, no single-use foodware accessory or standard condiment shall be provided by the food
 facility for delivery of ready-to-eat food.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a food facility from making unwrapped single-use foodware accessories available to a consumer using refillable self-service dispensers that dispense one item at a time to allow for single-use foodware accessories to be obtained.

(g) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a food facility from making standard condiments available to a consumer using refillable self-service dispensers to allow for standard condiments to be obtained. A food facility that offers standard condiments is encouraged to use bulk dispensers for the condiments rather than condiments packaged for single use.

(h) Nothing in this
 section shall prevent a city, county, city and county, or other local public agency from adopting and implementing an ordinance or rule that would further restrict a food facility or a third-party food delivery platform from providing single-use foodware accessories or standard condiments to a consumer.

(i) A food facility is encouraged, but not required, to take actions in addition to the requirements of this section that support a goal of reducing the use of and waste generated by all single-use food service products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 505, Sec. 3.   (AB 1276)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42272.

(a) On or before June 1, 2022, a city, county, or city and county shall authorize an enforcement agency to enforce this chapter.

(b) The first and second violations of this chapter shall result in a notice of violation, and any subsequent violation shall constitute an infraction punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each day in violation, but not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 505, Sec. 4.   (AB 1276)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42273.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Correctional institutions, which has the same meaning as in Section 7502 of the Penal Code.

(b) Health care facilities licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1250) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or facilities that are owned or operated by a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Residential care facilities licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200)
 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Public and private school cafeterias, as referenced in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 505, Sec. 5.   (AB 1276)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.3. Single-Use Carryout Bags [42279. - 42288.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Declarations [42279. - 42279.]

42279.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) In November 2016, voters approved Proposition 67, a statewide referendum to uphold Senate Bill 270 (Chapter 850 of the Statutes of 2014) that banned single-use carryout bags. As a result, most grocery stores, retail stores with a pharmacy, convenience food stores, foodmarts, and liquor stores no longer provide single-use, lightweight, plastic carryout bags to their customers at the point of sale.

(2) Senate Bill 270 (Chapter 850 of the Statutes of 2014) allowed the use of thicker plastic carryout bags that were deemed reusable if they
 met specified standards. These thicker plastic carryout bags were not generally reused by consumers and resulted in an increased amount of plastic and plastic waste.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(1) Support and reflect the will of California voters who voted to ban the distribution of plastic carryout bags at stores.

(2) Incentivize California consumers to bring their own reusable bag for carrying out store purchases, with stores encouraging and supporting this practice, which will reduce the costly and wasteful practice of relying on store-provided carryout bags.

(3) Support sustainable and thriving communities and natural environments
 that are not burdened with pollution from plastic production nor littered with plastic waste.

(4) Eliminate plastic film carryout bags from grocery store distribution and increase the recycling of paper carryout bags.

(5) Reduce the proliferation of plastic pollution by eliminating the existing provision of law that allows plastic film carryout bags to be distributed as reusable bags under the state’s bag ban.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 453, Sec. 1.   (SB 1053)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Definitions [42280. - 42280.]

42280.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Carryout bag” means a bag of plastic, paper, or other material that is provided by a store to a customer at the point of sale for the purpose of carrying purchased goods and that is not a recycled paper bag.

(2) A carryout bag does not include any of the following:

(A) A bag provided by a pharmacy pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions
 Code to a customer purchasing a prescription medication.

(B) A nonhandled bag used to protect a purchased item from damaging or contaminating other purchased items when placed in a recycled paper bag or a compostable plastic bag.

(C) A precheckout bag, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42281.2.

(D) A nonhandled bag that is designed to be placed over articles of clothing on a hanger, such as a garment bag used in dry cleaning or laundry services.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(c) “Point of sale” means a place where purchased goods may be
 transferred to a customer, including, but not limited to, a checkout counter, self-checkout kiosk, in-store pickup, curbside delivery, and home delivery.
